Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.210

Landscape architects' license account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5294-S.SL) ***

The landscape architects' license account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees under this chapter must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for administrative and operating purposes under this chapter. Only the director or the director's designees may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2009 c 370 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 17 and 19: "Sections 17 and 19 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 370 s 23.]

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.